Hawaii statutes.
§132D-7 License or permit required. A
person shall not:

(1) Import, store, offer to sell, or sell, at
wholesale or retail, aerial devices, display fireworks, articles pyrotechnic,
or consumer fireworks unless the person has a valid license issued by the
county; or

(2) Possess aerial devices, display fireworks, or
articles pyrotechnic without a valid license to import, store, or sell aerial
devices, display fireworks, or articles pyrotechnic, or a valid display permit
as provided for in this chapter. [L 1994, c 180, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 233, §7;
am L 2006, c 183, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next